Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2896
Pharmacy technician; reapplication for registration; lifting of disciplinary sanction.

A person whose registration has been denied, refused renewal, removed, or suspended from the Pharmacy Technician Registry may reapply for registration or for lifting of the disciplinary sanction at any time in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department.

Laws 2007, LB236, § 37;

R.S.Supp.,2007, § 71-1,147.71.